de: Verwendungszweck der Politur: Antistatische Staubreduzierung; Reinigung und Glanz; Entfernung von Fingerabdrücken und Flecken; Finish-Pflege; Entfernung von Schleier und Trübung; Hochglanzpolitur; Entfernung von Oxidation und Anlaufspuren; Schutzbeschichtung; Reduzierung von Kratzern und Mikrokratzern; UV-Schutz; Sonstige
da: Poleringsformål: Antistatisk støvreduktion; Rengøring og glans; Fjernelse af fingeraftryk og pletter; Pleje af overflade; Fjernelse af mathed og uklarhed; Højglanspolering; Fjernelse af oxidering og anløbning; Beskyttende belægning; Reduktion af ridser og hvirvelmærker; UV-beskyttelse; Andet
sl-SI: Sestava čistila: Antistatično odpravljanje prahu; Čiščenje in sijaj; Odstranjevanje prstnih odtisov in madežev; Negovanje premaza; Odstranjevanje meglice in motnosti; Poliranje z visokim sijajem; Odstranjevanje oksidacije in rje; Zaščitni premaz; Zmanjšanje prask in sledi kroženja; Zaščita pred UV-žarki; Drugo
ro-RO: Scopul produsului de lustruire: Reducere antistatică a prafului; Curățare și luciu; Îndepărtarea amprentelor și a petelor; Întreținerea finisajului; Îndepărtarea aspectului opac și neclar; Lustruire cu luciu intens; Îndepărtarea oxidării și a mătuirii; Strat protector; Reducerea zgârieturilor și a urmelor circulare; Protecție UV; Altele
hr-HR: Svrha poliranja: Antistatičko smanjenje prašine; Čišćenje i sjaj; Uklanjanje otisaka prstiju i mrlja; Njega završnog premaza; Uklanjanje maglice i zamućenosti; Poliranje do visokog sjaja; Uklanjanje oksidacije i potamnjenja; Zaštitni premaz; Smanjenje ogrebotina i kružnih tragova; UV zaštita; Ostalo
pt-BR: Polidor finalidade: Redução de poeira antiestática; Limpeza e brilho; Remoção de marcas de dedos e manchas; Condicionamento de acabamento; Remoção de embaçamento e opacidade; Polimento de alto brilho; Remoção de oxidação e manchas; Revestimento protetor; Redução de arranhões e marcas de redemoinho; Proteção UV; Outros
zh-CN: 抛光剂用途: 防静电降尘; 清洁抛光; 去除指纹和污渍; 表面养护; 去除雾化和混浊; 高光抛光; 去氧化和除晦暗; 保护涂层; 减少划痕和螺旋纹; 防紫外线; 其他
es: Propósito del pulimento: Reducción de polvo antiestático; Limpieza y brillo; Eliminación de huellas dactilares y manchas; Acondicionamiento de acabados; Eliminación de opacidad y turbidez; Pulido de alto brillo; Eliminación de oxidación y deslustre; Capa protectora; Reducción de rasguños y marcas circulares; Protección UV; Otro
lt-LT: Poliravimo priemonės paskirtis: Antistatinis dulkių mažinimas; Valymas ir blizginimas; Pirštų atspaudų ir dėmių šalinimas; Apdailos kondicionavimas; Miglos ir drumstumo šalinimas; Aukšto blizgesio poliravimas; Oksidacijos ir tamsėjimo šalinimas; Apsauginė danga; Įbrėžimų ir sūkurių mažinimas; Apsauga nuo UV spindulių; Kita
ko: 광택제 목적: 정전기 방지 및 먼지 감소; 세정 및 광택; 지문 및 얼룩 제거; 마감 컨디셔닝; 헤이즈 및 백화 현상 제거; 고광택 폴리싱; 산화 및 변색 제거; 보호 코팅; 스크래치 및 스월 마크 감소; 자외선 차단; 기타
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของชาวโปแลนด์: ป้องกันไฟฟ้าสถิตและลดฝุ่น; ทำความสะอาดและเพิ่มความเงางาม; ลบรอยนิ้วมือและคราบรอยเปื้อน; บำรุงผิวเคลือบ; ลบความหมองและคราบฝ้า; ขัดเงาพิเศษ; ลบรอยออกซิเดชันและคราบหมองคล้ำ; สารเคลือบปกป้อง; ลดรอยขีดข่วนและรอยขนแมว; ป้องกันรังสียูวี; อื่นๆ
sv: Användningsområde för polish: Antistatisk dammreducering; Rengöring och glans; Borttagning av fingeravtryck och fläckar; Behandling av yta; Borttagning av matthet och grumlighet; Högglanspolering; Borttagning av oxidering och missfärgning; Skyddande beläggning; Minskning av repor och polerrosor; UV-skydd; Annat
sk-SK: Účel leštidla: Antistatická redukcia prachu; Čistenie a lesk; Odstránenie odtlačkov prstov a šmúh; Ošetrenie povrchovej úpravy; Odstránenie matnosti a zakalenia; Leštenie do vysokého lesku; Odstránenie oxidácie a zašlosti; Ochranný povlak; Redukcia škrabancov a šmúh; UV ochrana; Iné
tr: Cila amacı: Antistatik toz azaltma; Temizleme ve parlatma; Parmak izi ve leke giderme; Yüzey bakımı; Bulanıklık ve matlık giderme; Çok parlak cilalama; Oksitlenme ve kararma giderme; Koruyucu kaplama; Çizik ve dairesel iz azaltma; UV koruması; Diğer
vi: Mục đích đánh bóng: Chống tĩnh điện giảm bụi; Làm sạch và làm bóng; Loại bỏ dấu vân tay và vết bẩn; Dưỡng lớp hoàn thiện; Loại bỏ vết mờ và đục; Đánh bóng độ bóng cao; Loại bỏ quá trình oxy hóa và xỉn màu; Lớp phủ bảo vệ; Giảm vết xước và vết xoáy; Bảo vệ khỏi tia UV; Khác
ru: Назначение полироли: Антистатический эффект для уменьшения пыли; Очистка и блеск; Удаление отпечатков пальцев и пятен; Кондиционирование покрытия; Удаление помутнений и налета; Полировка до сияющего блеска; Удаление окисления и потускнения; Защитное покрытие; Уменьшение царапин и микротрещин; Защита от УФ-лучей; Другое
pt-PT: objetivo polaco: Redução de pó antiestático; Limpeza e brilho; Remoção de dedadas e manchas; Condicionamento de acabamento; Remoção de opacidade e embaciamento; Polimento de alto brilho; Remoção de oxidação e manchas; Revestimento protetor; Redução de riscos e marcas circulares; Proteção UV; Outro
nb: Poleringsformål: Antistatisk støvreduksjon; Rengjøring og glans; Fjerning av fingeravtrykk og flekker; Pleie av overflate; Fjerning av dis og uklarhet; Høyglanspolering; Fjerning av oksidering og anløping; Beskyttende belegg; Reduksjon av riper og virvler; UV-beskyttelse; Annet
el: Σκοπός χρήσης γυαλιστικού: Αντιστατικό (μείωση σκόνης); Καθαρισμός και λάμψη; Αφαίρεση δακτυλικών αποτυπωμάτων και λεκέδων; Περιποίηση φινιρίσματος; Αφαίρεση θαμπάδας; Γυάλισμα υψηλής στιλπνότητας; Αφαίρεση οξείδωσης και κηλίδων; Προστατευτική επίστρωση; Μείωση γρατσουνιών; Προστασία UV; Άλλο
hu: Polírozás célja: Antisztatikus porcsökkentés; Tisztítás és fényesítés; Ujjlenyomat- és folteltávolítás; Felületkondicionálás; Homályosság és opálosság eltávolítása; Magasfényű polírozás; Oxidáció és elszíneződés eltávolítása; Védőbevonat; Karcolások és mikrokarcolások csökkentése; UV-védelem; Egyéb
nl: Polijstmiddel doel: Antistatische stofvermindering; Reiniging en glans; Verwijdering van vingerafdrukken en vlekken; Verzorging van afwerking; Verwijdering van waas en troebelheid; Hoogglans polijsten; Verwijdering van oxidatie en aanslag; Beschermende coating; Vermindering van krassen en kringen; Uv-bescherming; Overig
fi: Kiillotusaineen käyttötarkoitus: Antistaattinen pölyn vähentäminen; Puhdistus ja kiilto; Sormenjälkien ja tahrojen poisto; Pinnan hoito; Harmauden ja sameuden poisto; Korkeakiiltoinen kiillotus; Hapettumien ja tummentumien poisto; Suojapinnoite; Naarmujen ja pyörteiden vähentäminen; UV-suoja; Muu
it: Finalità del lucido: Riduzione della polvere antistatica; Pulizia e lucidatura; Rimozione di impronte e macchie; Manutenzione della finitura; Rimozione di opacità e aloni; Lucidatura ad alta brillantezza; Rimozione di ossidazione e appannamento; Rivestimento protettivo; Riduzione di graffi e segni circolari; Protezione UV; Altro
bg-BG: Цел за полиране: Антистатично намаляване на праха; Почистване и блясък; Отстраняване на отпечатъци и петна; Кондициониране на покритието; Премахване на мъгла и замъгляване; Полиране с висок блясък; Премахване на оксидация и потъмняване; Защитно покритие; Намаляване на драскотини и следи от кръгови движения; UV защита; Други
fr: Fonction du produit d’entretien: Réduction de la poussière (antistatique); Nettoyage et brillance; Élimination des empreintes et des taches; Entretien de la finition; Élimination du voile et de l’opacité; Polissage ultra-brillant; Élimination de l’oxydation et du ternissement; Revêtement protecteur; Réduction des rayures et tourbillons; Protection UV; Autre
en: Polish purpose: Anti-static dust reduction; Cleaning and shine; Fingerprint and smudge removal; Finish conditioning; Haze and cloudiness removal; High gloss polishing; Oxidation and tarnish removal; Protective coating; Scratch and swirl reduction; UV protection; Other
cs: Účel laku: Antistatická redukce prachu; Čištění a lesk; Odstranění otisků prstů a šmouh; Ošetření povrchové úpravy; Odstranění zamlžení a zakalení; Leštění do vysokého lesku; Odstranění oxidace a skvrn; Ochranná vrstva; Redukce škrábanců a kruhových stop; Ochrana proti UV záření; Jiné
zh-TW: 拋光目的: 抗靜電除塵; 清潔亮光; 去除指紋及污漬; 表面保養; 去除霧化和混濁; 高光澤拋光; 去除氧化及失去光澤處; 保護塗層; 減少刮痕和太陽紋; 抗 UV 防護; 其他
pl: Przeznaczenie politury: Antystatyczna redukcja kurzu; Czyszczenie i nabłyszczanie; Usuwanie odcisków palców i smug; Pielęgnacja wykończenia; Usuwanie matowień i zmętnień; Polerowanie na wysoki połysk; Usuwanie utleniania i nalotu; Powłoka ochronna; Redukcja zarysowań i mikrozarysowań; Ochrona UV; Inne
ja: ポリッシュの用途: 静電気防止によるホコリの軽減; クリーニングとツヤ出し; 指紋と汚れの除去; 仕上げのコンディショニング; くもりと濁りの除去; 高光沢の研磨; 酸化と変色の除去; 保護コーティング; 傷と渦巻き模様の軽減; UV保護; その他